Washington statutes.
RCW 27.18.030

Compact administrator—Deputies—Library agreements, submittal.

The state librarian shall be the compact administrator pursuant to Article X of the compact. The state librarian shall appoint one or more deputy compact administrators. Every library agreement made pursuant to Article VI of the compact shall, as a condition precedent to its entry into force, be submitted to the state librarian for his or her recommendations.

[ 2011 c 336 s 705; 1965 ex.s. c 93 s 3.]